Tennessee, session 114, HB0666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3024(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3024(e), is amended by
deleting "After submission of the report required in subsection (d), the department" and
substituting "The department".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0666
002748
- 1 -